Rhode Island statutes. Title 37 Public Property and Works
Chapter 15 Litter Control and Recycling

37-15-1.
Statement of policy.

Recognizing the ever increasing mobility of the people of Rhode Island as well as the fundamental need for a healthful, clean, and beautiful environment; and further recognizing that the proliferation and accumulation of litter discarded throughout this state impairs this need and constitutes a public health hazard; and further recognizing the need to conserve energy and natural resources; and further recognizing that there is an imperative need to anticipate, plan for, and accomplish effective litter control and recover and recycle waste materials pertinent to litter with the subsequent conservation of resources and energy, there is hereby enacted this “litter control and recycling” chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 251, § 2.

37-15-2.
Declaration of purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to accomplish litter control and establish community recycling programs throughout this state by delegating to the department of environmental management the authority to:

Conduct a permanent and continuous program to control and remove litter from this state to the maximum practical extent possible;

Recover and recycle waste materials related to litter and littering;

Encourage private recycling; and

Increase public awareness of the need for recycling and litter control.

It is further the intent and purpose of this chapter to create jobs for employment in litter cleanup and related activities and to encourage small, private recycling centers.

This program shall include the compatible goal of recovery of recyclable materials to conserve energy and natural resources wherever practicable.

Every department of state government and all local governmental units and agencies of this state shall cooperate with the department of environmental management in the administration and enforcement of this chapter.

The intent of this chapter is to add to and coordinate existing recycling and litter control and removal efforts and not terminate or supplant those efforts.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 251, § 2.

37-15-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter the following terms shall, where the context permits, be construed as follows:

“Community recycling center” means a central collection point in a community for recyclable materials, or a point where the materials are taken after being collected to be processed.

“Department” means the department of environmental management.

“Director” means the director of the department of environmental management.

“Litter” means garbage, trash, waste, rubbish, ashes, cans, bottles, wire, paper, cartons, boxes, automobile parts, furniture, glass, or anything else of an unsightly or unsanitary nature thrown, dropped, discarded, placed, or deposited by a person on public property, on private property not owned by the person, or in or on waters of the state, unless the person has:

Been directed to do so by a public official as part of a litter collection drive;

Discarded, thrown, dropped, placed, or discarded the material in a litter receptacle in a manner that prevented the material from being carried away by the elements; or

Been issued a license or permit covering the material pursuant to chapters 18.9 and 19.1 of title 23.

“Litter bag” means a bag, sack, or other container made of any material which is large enough to serve as a receptacle for litter inside a vehicle or watercraft.

“Litter receptacle” means those containers adopted by the department of environmental management and which may be standardized as to size, shape, capacity, and color and which shall bear the state anti litter symbol, as well as any other receptacles suitable for the depositing of litter.

“Person” means any natural person, political subdivision, government agency, public or private corporation, partnership, joint venture, association, firm, individual proprietorship, or other entity whatsoever.

“Program” means those activities of the department to encourage, manage, and fund litter control and recycling pursuant to this chapter.

“Public place” means any area that is used or held out for use by the public whether owned or operated by public or private interests.

“Recycling” means the reuse of recovered resources in manufacturing, agriculture, power production, or other processes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 251, § 2.

37-15-4.
[Obsolete.]

37-15-5.
Enforcement.

State police officers, local police officers, forest rangers, park police officers, conservation officers, all other state and local enforcement officers, and department staff members as designated by the director are hereby authorized to enforce the provisions of this chapter.

All violations of this chapter shall be heard by the traffic tribunal in accordance with §

8-8.2-2

.

Subsection (b)(1) shall not be construed to limit the jurisdiction of any court to hear violations of other laws, including local ordinances and regulations relating to litter.

Cities and towns may, through their chief executive officers, authorize designated municipal employees in addition to those described in subsection (a) to enforce the provisions of this chapter. The employees may also be authorized to enforce local ordinances and regulations relating to litter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 251, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 220, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 162, § 1.

37-15-6.
Littering prohibited.

No person shall throw, drop, deposit, discard, or otherwise dispose of litter upon any public property in the state or in the waters of this state or upon private property in this state owned by him or her except:

When the property is designated by the state or by any of its agencies or political subdivisions for the disposal of solid waste or litter, and the person is authorized to use the property for that purpose; or

Into a litter receptacle in a manner that the litter will be prevented from being carried away by the elements.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 251, § 2.

37-15-7.
Penalties.

Any person convicted of a first violation of this chapter shall, except where a penalty is specifically set forth, be subject to a fine of not less than eighty-five dollars ($85.00), nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000). In addition to, or in lieu of, the fine imposed hereunder, the person so convicted may be ordered to pick up litter for not less than two (2), nor more than twenty-five (25), hours.

Any person convicted of a second or subsequent violation of this chapter shall, except where a penalty is specifically set forth, be subject to a fine of not less than three hundred dollars ($300), nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000). In addition to, or in lieu of, the fine imposed upon a second or subsequent violation of this chapter, the person so convicted may be ordered to pick up litter for not less than four (4), nor more than fifty (50), hours.

Jurisdiction to punish violators of the provisions of this chapter is conferred on the traffic tribunal.

Any person convicted of a violation of this chapter shall, in addition to all other penalties, be liable for the removal of all litter or ordered to pay restitution for the cost of removal of all litter illegally disposed of by that person. The traffic tribunal may hold the registration of any vehicle owned by the violator and used in the act of littering until the aforementioned liability is satisfied.

The funds received by a state law enforcement agency shall be deposited as general revenues; provided, however, that thirty percent (30%) of any fine collected pursuant to a complaint filed by a local law enforcement agency shall inure to the benefit of that agency, with remittances to be made not less often than once every three (3) months.

Penalties of eighty-five dollars ($85.00) for violations of this section may be disposed of without the necessity of personally appearing before the traffic tribunal. Said penalty may be handled administratively by mailing a check or money order, together with the properly executed form provided, to the appropriate address as set forth in the summons issued by the enforcing agent.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 251, § 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 150, § 43; P.L. 1985, ch. 155, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 317, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 70, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 433, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 114; P.L. 1997, ch. 72, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 58, § 12; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 128; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 12, § 17; P.L. 2014, ch. 368, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 430, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 453, § 1.

37-15-7.1.
Penalties — Used tires.

No person shall deposit, discard, or otherwise dispose of used tires in violation of §

37-15-6

. Any person convicted of a first violation of this section shall be subject to a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), be ordered to pick up tires so disposed in the community for not less than eight (8) nor more than thirty-two (32) hours, be imprisoned for a period not to exceed ten (10) days or by any combination of fine, community pick-up, and/or imprisonment.

Any person convicted of a second violation of this section shall be subject to a fine not less than three hundred dollars ($300) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), be ordered to pick up tires so disposed in the community for not less than sixteen (16), nor more than forty (40) hours, and/or be imprisoned for a period of not to exceed thirty (30) days, or by any combination of fine, community pick-up, and/or imprisonment.

Any person convicted of a third or subsequent violation of this section shall be subject to a fine not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), be ordered to pick up tires so disposed in the community for not less than twenty-four (24), nor more than eighty (80) hours, and/or be imprisoned for a period not to exceed sixty (60) days, or by any combination of fine, community pick-up, and/or imprisonment.

Jurisdiction to punish violators of the provisions of this chapter is conferred on the traffic tribunal.

Any person convicted of a violation of this chapter shall, in addition to all other penalties, be liable for the removal or cost of removal of all litter illegally disposed of by that person. The traffic tribunal court may hold the registration of any vehicle owned by the violator and used in the act of littering until the aforementioned liability is satisfied.’

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 222, § 1.

37-15-8.
Notice.

Pertinent portions of this chapter shall be posted along the public highways of this state and in all campgrounds and trailer parks, at all entrances to state parks, forest lands, and recreational areas, at all public beaches, and at other public places in this state where persons are likely to be informed of the existence and content of this chapter and the penalties for violating its provisions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 251, § 2.

37-15-9.
Litter receptacles.

The department shall design and the director shall adopt by rule or regulation one or more types of state litter receptacles which are reasonably uniform as to size, shape, capacity, and color, for wide and extensive distribution throughout the public places of this state. Each litter receptacle shall bear an anti litter symbol as designed and adopted by the department. In addition, all litter receptacles shall be designed to attract attention and to encourage the depositing of litter.

Litter receptacles of the uniform design shall be placed along the public highways of this state and at all parks, campgrounds, trailer parks, drive-in restaurants, gasoline service stations, tavern parking lots, shopping centers, grocery store parking lots, liquor store parking lots, parking lots of major industrial firms, marinas, boat launching areas, boat moorage and fueling stations, public and private piers, beaches and bathing areas, and at such other public places within this state as specified by rule or regulation of the director. The number of receptacles required to be placed as specified herein shall be determined as prescribed by the director.

It shall be the responsibility of any person owning or operating any establishment or public place in which litter receptacles of the uniform design are required by this section to procure and place the receptacles at their own expense on the premises in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the department. Litter receptacles must be made available to the public as recommended by the department.

The department shall establish a system of grants to aid cities, towns, and counties in procuring and placing litter receptacles. The grants shall be on a matching basis under which the local government involved electing to participate in this grant program shall be required to pay at least fifty percent (50%) of the total costs of the procurement of receptacles sufficient in number to meet departmental guidelines established by rule pursuant to this section. The amount of the grant shall be determined on a case by case basis by the director after consideration of need, available departmental and local government funds, degree of prior compliance by the local government involved in placement of receptacles, and other relevant criteria. The responsibility for maintaining and emptying the receptacles shall remain with the unit of local government. The provisions of this chapter as they may relate to any city or town shall not be construed to be a reimbursable state mandated cost pursuant to §§

45-13-7

—

45-13-10

.

Any person, other than a political subdivision, government agency, or municipality, who fails to place the litter receptacles on the premises in the numbers required by rule or regulation of the department, violating the provisions of this section or rules or regulations adopted thereunder, shall be subject to a fine of ten dollars ($10.00) for each day of violation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 251, § 2.

37-15-10.
Litter bags.

The department shall design and produce a litter bag bearing the state anti litter symbol and a statement of the penalties prescribed herein for littering in this state. The department may make litter bags available to the owners of motor vehicles and watercraft in this state and may also provide litter bags at no charge at points of entry into this state and at visitor centers to the operators of incoming vehicles and watercraft.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 251, § 2.

37-15-11.
Responsibility for removal of litter.

The owners and operators of public places shall be responsible for the removal of litter from litter receptacles.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 251, § 2.

37-15-12.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 251, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 114; Repealed by P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 164, effective July 8, 1997.

37-15-13.
Allocation of funds.

The department shall allocate and distribute money from the litter control appropriation, by way of grants or transfers, to eligible persons for the following activities:

Collecting litter along public streets and highways, on parks and recreation lands, and on or along the waters of the state including, but not limited to, expenditures for a youth corps litter program which is hereby created and which shall employ persons from the state. To facilitate litter collection, the department shall transfer fifty-six thousand two hundred and fifty dollars ($56,250) on July 1, 1993, October 1, 1993, January 1, 1994, April 1, 1994, and every year thereafter, to the Department of Corrections for the purposes of litter pick-up on the state’s highways;

Establishing or expanding community recycling centers;

Improving enforcement of litter laws;

Purchasing litter receptacles, litter bags, collection and pickup equipment, and related materials;

Designing and publishing a state anti-litter symbol;

Organizing and conducting educational programs designed to increase public awareness of the litter problem, the need for compliance with anti-litter laws, the need for recycling, and the availability of community recycling centers;

Conducting initial surveys of the amount and composition of litter on the public places in the state and conducting follow-up surveys to measure the progress of litter reduction and recycling programs; and

Purchasing and erecting roadside signs indicating the penalties imposed for littering or the availability of community recycling centers.

Any city or town that initiates a program mandating separation of certain forms of garbage, rubbish, or trash (such as newspapers, bottles, and cans) for the purpose of recycling shall be eligible to receive a grant or loan from the litter control account for that program.

The department shall not use any funds for the purpose of replacing any litter pickup or rubbish removal activity presently performed by the department.

The department of transportation shall continue to be responsible for the removal of litter from all state highways.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 251, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 74, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 114.

37-15-14.
Application procedure.

A person eligible to receive a grant, loan, or contract under this chapter, and the department’s regulations adopted pursuant thereto, may make an application for the loan, grant, or contract in such form as may be required by the department.

The department shall grant or loan funds, and contract for services from the litter control account to an eligible person who has submitted an application for funds upon determining that the plan submitted by the person is qualified and suitable for purposes of the program.

The department shall require periodic reports to be filed by grant recipients. The department shall review, evaluate, and follow up on any actions taken by grant recipients to ensure that the purposes of this chapter are being achieved.

The department shall require that grant recipients post a recycling and redemption rate schedule for public inspection.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 251, § 2; P.L. 1989, ch. 372, § 1.

37-15-15.
Duties of the department.

In addition to the foregoing, the department shall:

Serve as the coordinating agency between the various industry organizations seeking to aid in the anti litter and recycling efforts;

Recommend to the governing bodies of all local governments that they adopt ordinances consistent with the provisions of this chapter;

Cooperate with all local governments to accomplish coordination of local anti litter and recycling efforts;

Encourage, organize, and coordinate all voluntary local anti litter and recycling campaigns seeking to focus the attention of the public on the programs of this state to control and remove litter and to foster recycling;

Investigate the availability of and apply for funds available from any private or public source to be used in the program outlined in this chapter;

Develop statewide programs to increase public awareness of and participation in recycling and to encourage community recycling centers, public participation in recycling and research and development in the field of litter control, and recycling, removal, and disposal of litter related recycling materials;

Establish a technical assistance program to assist cities and towns in establishing separation recycling programs in conjunction with recycling collection centers to be constructed at state solid waste management facilities.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 251, § 2; P.L. 1986, ch. 522, § 5.

37-15-16.
Cooperation between industry and department.

To aid in the state anti litter and recycling campaign, the general assembly requests that the various industry organizations which are active in anti litter and recycling efforts provide active cooperation with the department so that the additional effect may be given to the anti litter and recycling campaign of the state of Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 251, § 2.

37-15-17.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the chapter or the application of the provisions to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 251, § 2.

37-15-18.
Distribution of flyers on motor vehicles on private property — Penalties.

No person, corporation, partnership, or association shall cause to be or shall distribute flyers on motor vehicles on private commercial property. Flyers shall mean commercial advertising literature which shall include, but not be limited to, advertisement of products or services, whether free or not; notices of events of any type; solicitation of funds, services, signatures or assistance of any causes; etc. Violators of this section shall be fined two hundred dollars ($200), the proceeds of which shall go to the OSCAR fund.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 366, § 1.

37-15-19.
Protection of state coastline — Adult designated smoking areas.

Whereas it has been conclusively shown that pollution in the form of discarded cigarettes pose a major threat to the integrity of the coastline in this state, every municipality bordering on such coastline may adopt rules and regulations for the establishment of adult designated smoking areas for the purpose of reducing such cigarette litter and pollution.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 132, § 1.